Alaska statutes. Title 32. Partnership.
Article 11. General Provisions.

Sec. 32.06.990.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000)

Sec. 32.06.995.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise,

“business” includes a trade, an occupation, or a profession;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

“debtor in bankruptcy” means a person who is the subject of

an order for relief under 11 U.S.C. (Bankruptcy Code) or a comparable order under a successor statute of general application; or

a comparable order under federal, state, or foreign law governing insolvency;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“distribution” means a transfer of money or other property from a partnership to a partner in the partner’s capacity as a partner or to the partner’s transferee;

“domestic partnership” means a partnership whose internal relations are governed by the laws of this state;

“foreign limited liability partnership” means a partnership that

is formed under laws other than the laws of this state; and

has the status of a limited liability partnership under those laws;

“foreign partnership” means a partnership other than a domestic partnership;

“limited liability partnership” or “domestic limited liability partnership” means a partnership that has filed a statement of qualification under AS

32.06.911

and does not have a similar statement in effect in another jurisdiction;

“partnership” means an association of two or more persons to carry on as co-owners a business for profit formed under AS

32.06.202

, predecessor law, or a comparable law of another jurisdiction;

“partnership agreement” means the agreement, whether written, oral, or implied, among the partners concerning the partnership, including amendments to the partnership agreement;

“partnership at will” means a partnership in which the partners have not agreed to remain partners until the expiration of a definite term or the completion of a particular undertaking;

“partnership interest” or “partner’s interest in the partnership” means all of a partner’s interests in the partnership, including the partner’s transferable interest and all management and other rights;

“person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity;

“property” means all property, including real, personal, mixed, tangible, or intangible property, or an interest in property;

“state” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

“statement” means a statement of partnership authority under AS

32.06.303

, a statement of denial under AS

32.06.304

, a statement of dissociation under AS

32.06.704

, a statement of dissolution under AS

32.06.805

, a statement of merger under AS

32.06.907

, a statement of qualification under AS

32.06.911

, a statement of foreign qualification under AS

32.06.922

, or an amendment or cancellation of any of the foregoing;

“surviving partnership” means a domestic or foreign partnership into which one or more domestic or foreign partnerships are merged, whether or not preexisting the merger or created by the merger;

“transfer” includes an assignment, conveyance, lease, mortgage, deed, and encumbrance.

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000; am §§ 22, 23 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

The paragraphs in this section were reorganized in 2013 to maintain alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (7) (now (9)), inserted “or ‘domestic limited liability partnership’ ” following “ ‘limited liability partnership’ ”; added definitions for “domestic partnership”, “foreign partnership”, and “surviving partnership”.

Sec. 32.06.997.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Partnership Act.

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000)